Massachusetts, session 194th, S1175.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The first sentence of the second paragraph of section 92A of chapter 272 of
the General Laws as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after
word “place”, the following words:- or business,
SECTION 2. The first sentence of the second paragraph of section 92A of chapter 272 is
hereby amended by inserting after words “patronage of”, the following words:- or offers
products or services to
SECTION 3. Chapter 272 Section 98 of the General Laws is hereby amended to read as
follows:
of 2

Whoever makes any distinction, discrimination or restriction on account of race, color,
religious creed, national origin, sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, which shall not include
persons whose sexual orientation involves minor children as the sex object, deafness, blindness
or any physical or mental disability or ancestry relative to the admission of or whose operations,
products or services result in a discriminatory or physically injurious effect on any protected
person to, or his treatment by or in any place of public accommodation, resort or amusement, as
defined in section ninety-two A, or whoever aids or incites such distinction, discrimination,
treatment, physically injurious effect or restriction, whether or not the aggrieved protected party
seeks access to the patronage, products or services offered by the place of accommodation, resort
or amusement, shall be punished by a fine of not more than twenty-five hundred dollars or by
imprisonment for not more than one year, or both, and shall be liable to any person aggrieved
thereby for such damages as are enumerated in section five of chapter one hundred and fifty-one
B; provided, however, that such civil forfeiture shall be of an amount not less than three hundred
dollars; but such person so aggrieved shall not recover against more than one person by reason of
any one act of distinction, discrimination or restriction. All persons shall have the right to the full
and equal accommodations, advantages, facilities and privileges and the right to not be
physically injured by the operations, products or services of any place of public accommodation,
resort or amusement whether or not the aggrieved protected party seeks access to the patronage,
products or services offered by the place of accommodation, resort or amusement, subject only to
the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable to all persons. This right is
recognized and declared to be a civil right.
of 2